Oklahoma, session 2025, SB807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3170.1 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Vaccine


Transparency and Informed Consent Act”.


B. The purpose of this act is to ensure transparency in


vaccine-related health care practices and to establish informed


consent standards by requiring health care providers to disclose



Req. No. 1583 Page 1


comprehensive, evidence-based information regarding vaccines before


administration.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3170.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Before administering any vaccine, health care providers


shall provide the patient with a written document containing the


following:


1. A complete list of all ingredients in the vaccine, including


active and inactive components, consistent with the Centers for


Disease Control and Prevention’s Vaccine Excipient and Media Summary


(Pink Book, Appendix B);


2. A summary of the testing and development process of the


vaccine, including clinical trial phases, study size, and results


related to safety and efficacy;


3. A comprehensive outline of all known and potential health


and safety risks, including short-term and long-term side effects


reported in:


a. clinical trials, and


b. post-market surveillance, including Vaccine Adverse


Event Reporting System (VAERS) data;


4. Information regarding any ethical considerations, including


the use of fetal tissue cell lines, animal-derived components, or



Req. No. 1583 Page 2


other materials deemed controversial during development or


production;


5. A clear statement regarding the availability of exemptions


under state law for religious, medical, or personal beliefs; and


6. Information on the National Vaccine Injury Compensation


Program (VICP) and patient rights regarding injury claims.


B. The written document shall:


1. Be provided prior to administration of the vaccine; and


2. Include a statement that the patient has the right to


accept, decline, or defer the vaccine.


C. Health care providers shall:


1. Allow the patient sufficient time to review the materials;


and


2. Answer any questions in a clear and understandable manner


regarding vaccine risks, benefits, and ingredients.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3170.3 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Prior to administering any vaccine, health care providers


shall obtain the patient’s written informed consent, which shall


include acknowledgment of the following:


1. Receipt and understanding of the materials provided under


subsection A of Section 2 of this act;



Req. No. 1583 Page 3


2. The patient’s voluntary decision to accept, decline, or


defer the vaccine; and


3. Confirmation that the patient has had the opportunity to ask


questions and receive answers.


B. Copies of the signed informed consent forms shall be


retained in the patient’s medical record for a minimum of seven (7)


years.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3170.4 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any health care provider or institution found in violation


of this act shall be subject to an administrative penalty by the


provider’s or institution’s licensing board or agency in the amount


up to:


1. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per occurrence for failure


to provide the required transparency and disclosure documentation;


and


2. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per occurrence for


administering a vaccine without obtaining written informed consent.


B. Repeat violations may result in additional disciplinary


action by the provider’s or institution’s licensing board or agency,


including suspension or revocation of licenses, where applicable.


C. Patients who believe this act has been violated may:



Req. No. 1583 Page 4


1. File a formal complaint with the appropriate licensing board


or agency; and


2. Pursue civil action for damages in a court of law.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3170.5 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


All documentation, informed consent records, and related


materials shall remain confidential and protected under the Health


Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and


other relevant state and federal privacy laws.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1583 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:44 AM























Req. No. 1583 Page 5